Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.53, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Eminent domain prohibited. new text end new text begin Money appropriated from the parks and trails fund must not be spent to acquire property by eminent domain unless the owner requests that the owner's property be acquired by eminent domain. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 114D.50, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Eminent domain prohibited. new text end new text begin Money appropriated from the clean water fund must not be spent to acquire property by eminent domain unless the owner requests that the owner's property be acquired by eminent domain. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 129D.17, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Eminent domain prohibited. new text end new text begin Money appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund must not be spent to acquire property by eminent domain unless the owner requests that the owner's property be acquired by eminent domain. new text end